Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4402.02
Hybrid animal; vaccination against rabies; required; vaccine; sales.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, every hybrid animal in the State of Nebraska shall be vaccinated against rabies and shall be revaccinated at intervals specified by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. A young hybrid animal shall be initially vaccinated at the age specified in such rules and regulations. An unvaccinated hybrid animal acquired or moved into the State of Nebraska shall be vaccinated within thirty days after purchase or arrival unless under the age for initial vaccination.

(2) The rabies vaccine used to vaccinate a hybrid animal pursuant to this section shall be sold only to licensed veterinarians.

(3) An owner of a hybrid animal in this state prior to the date of development of a licensed vaccine determined scientifically to be reliable in preventing rabies in a hybrid animal shall have one year after such date to comply with this section.

Laws 2007, LB25, § 3.